Florida, session 2026, SB1652.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 7 8 Section 1.âSubsection (5) of section 393.063, Florida 9 Statutes, is amended to read: 10 393.063âDefinitions.âFor the purposes of this chapter, the 11 term: 12 (5)ââAutismâ and âautism spectrum disorderâ mean means a 13 condition as defined by the most recent edition of the 14 Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders of the 15 American Psychiatric Association pervasive, neurologically based 16 developmental disability of extended duration which causes 17 severe learning, communication, and behavior disorders with age 18 of onset during infancy or childhood. Individuals with autism 19 exhibit impairment in reciprocal social interaction, impairment 20 in verbal and nonverbal communication and imaginative ability, 21 and a markedly restricted repertoire of activities and 22 interests. 23 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.